Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2177
Trial; proof.

Each of the parties appearing, whether as plaintiff or defendant, must exhibit his documentary proof of title, if he has any, and must file the same, or copies thereof, with the clerk.

R.S.1867, Code § 809, p. 539;

R.S.1913, § 8292;

C.S.1922, § 9245;

C.S.1929, § 20-2177;

R.S.1943, § 25-2177.

Abstracts of title, when used as evidence, see section 25-1292.

Method of proving claims of both plaintiffs and defendants is provided. Fairley v. Kemper, 174 Neb. 565, 118 N.W.2d 754 (1962).

In partition suit, each party must exhibit his documentary proof of title. Frankenberger v. Holm, 154 Neb. 80, 46 N.W.2d 901 (1951).

Filing documentary evidence is not jurisdictional. Kazebeer v. Nunemaker, 82 Neb. 732, 118 N.W. 646 (1908).